California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
 the Pooled Money Investment Board to be the current earning rate of the fund from which loaned. This subdivision does not authorize any transfer that will interfere with the carrying out of the object for which the Employment Training Fund was created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 224.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1611.5.

Notwithstanding Section 1611, the Legislature may appropriate from the Employment Training Fund an amount specified in the annual Budget Act to fund the local assistance portion of welfare-to-work activities under the CalWORKs program, provided for pursuant to Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as administered by the State Department of Social Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 75, Sec. 25.   Effective July 12, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Collections [1701. - 1900.]



  ARTICLE 1. Priority and Lien of Tax [1701. - 1703.]

1701.

The wage earner and employer contributions required to be paid by any employing unit under this division, together with interest and penalties, shall be satisfied first in any of the following cases:

(a) Whenever the employing unit is insolvent.

(b) Whenever the employing unit makes a voluntary assignment of its assets.

(c) Whenever the estate of the employing unit in the hands of the executors, administrators, or heirs is insufficient to pay all the debts due from the deceased.

(d) Whenever the estate and effects of an absconding, concealed, or absent employing unit required to pay any amount under this division are levied upon by process of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 449.)
-------------------------------------------

1702.

Section 1701 does not give the state a preference over any lien or security interest which was recorded or perfected prior to the time when the state records or files its lien as provided in Section 7171 of the Government Code. The preference given to the state by Section 1701 is subordinate to the preferences given to claims for personal services by Sections 1204 and 1206 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 600, Sec. 63.)
-------------------------------------------

1703.

(a) If any employing unit or other person fails to pay any amount imposed under this division at the time that it becomes due and payable, the amount thereof, including penalties and interest, together with any costs, shall be a perfected and enforceable state tax lien. This lien is subject to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(b) For purposes of this section, amounts are “due and payable” on the following dates:

(1) For amounts disclosed on a return or report received by the director, the date of the notice by the director to the taxpayer of the amount due.

(2) For penalties imposed pursuant to Sections 1112.5, 1114, and 13052.5, the date of the notice by the director to the taxpayer of the amount due.

(3) For any amounts reestablished under Section 1875, the date of the written notice of rescission provided under subdivision (c) of that section.

(4) For all other amounts, the date the assessment is final.

(c) The lien provided by this section shall not arise during any period that Section 362 of the United States Bankruptcy Code applies to the employing unit or other person against whom the lien would otherwise apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1049, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Liability of Successors, Officers and Fiduciaries [1731. - 1736.]

1731.

Any person or employing unit that acquires the organization, trade or business, or substantially all the assets thereof, of an employer shall withhold in trust money or other property sufficient in amount or value to cover the amount of any contributions, interest and penalties due or unpaid from such employer until such employer produces a certificate from the department stating that no contributions, interest or penalties are due. If such employer does not produce such certificate, the acquiring person or employing unit shall pay the amount or the value of the property so withheld to the department at the time of such acquisition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1720.)
-------------------------------------------

1732.

(a) Upon request of either of the parties to an acquisition as described in Section 1731, the department shall within 30 days issue a certificate, or a statement showing the amount of any contributions, interest and penalties claimed to be due. The failure to issue a certificate or a statement within the period of 30 days shall be deemed equivalent to the issuance of a certificate stating that no contributions, interest or penalties are due.

(b) If the department issues a statement showing the amount of contributions, interest and penalties claimed to be due, the amount stated therein shall be withheld and paid to the department such amount, however, not to exceed the purchase price. The issuance of any certificate stating that no contributions, interest and penalties are due, or the failure to issue such certificate or statement within the period of 30 days shall not release the employer from liability on account of any contributions, interest and penalties then or thereafter determined to be due from him, but shall release the acquiring person or employing unit from any further liability on account of any such contributions, interest and penalties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1720.)
-------------------------------------------

1733.

Any person or employing unit that fails to withhold money or other property or fails to pay the amount or value of the property withheld as provided in Sections 1731 and 1732 shall be personally liable for the payment of the contributions, interest and penalties due from the employer up to but not exceeding the purchase price. The director shall assess such amount to the acquiring person or employing unit and shall give a written notice of the assessment pursuant to Section 1206. Sections 1135, 1136, 1137, 1221, 1222, 1223, and 1224 apply to assessments under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1082.)
-------------------------------------------

1734.

The director shall have all of the remedies for collection against any person or employing unit that acquires the organization, trade or business, or substantially all the assets thereof of an employer as are provided by this division against any employer liable for contributions, interest and penalties due. The time within which the obligation may be enforced against the person or employing unit acquiring the organization, trade or business, or substantially all the assets thereof of an employer shall start to run with the day the assessment against such person or employing unit becomes final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1720.)
-------------------------------------------

1735.

Any officer, major stockholder, or other person, having charge of the affairs of a corporate, association, registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership, or limited liability company employing unit, who willfully fails to pay contributions required by this division or withholdings required by Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) on the date on which they become delinquent, shall be personally liable for the amount of the contributions, withholdings, penalties, and interest due and unpaid by such employing unit. The director may assess such officer, stockholder, or other person for the amount of such contributions, withholdings, penalties, and interest. The provisions of Article 8 (commencing with Section 1126) and Article 9 (commencing with Section 1176) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 apply to assessments made pursuant to this section. Sections 1221, 1222, 1223, and 1224 shall apply to assessments made pursuant to this section. With respect to such officer, stockholder, or other person, the director shall have all the collection remedies set forth in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 679, Sec. 18.   Effective October 10, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1735.1.

(a) An individual who has been assessed under the provisions of Section 1128.1, or an officer, major stockholder, or other person having charge of the affairs of a business entity that has been assessed under the provisions of that section, shall be personally liable for the amount of contributions, withholdings, penalties, and interest due and unpaid by the employer, other than those under subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 1128, for whom money was exchanged as described in Section 1128.1. The director may assess that person for the amount of contributions, withholdings, all penalties other than those under Section 1128, and interest. The provisions of Article 8 (commencing with Section 1126) and Article 9 (commencing with Section 1176) of
 Chapter 4 apply to assessments made pursuant to this section. Sections 1221, 1222, 1223, and 1224 apply to assessments made pursuant to this section. With respect to that person, the director shall have all the collection remedies set forth in this chapter.

(b) For purposes of this section, “business entity” means a partnership, corporation, association, limited liability company, or Indian tribe (as described by Section 3306(u) of Title 26 of the United States Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 522.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1736.

In addition to other penalties prescribed in this division, failure to file the notice required by Section 1090 shall cause the assignee, receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, or other representative of an insolvent employing unit, or the administrator or executor of the estate of the deceased employing unit to be personally responsible for all loss in contributions, penalties and interest attributable to such failure. This liability may be enforced by civil action in the name of the State of California against the assignee, receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, or other representative of the insolvent employing unit, and against the administrator or executor of the deceased employing unit.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Notices of Levy [1755. - 1758.]

1755.

(a) If any person or employing unit is delinquent in the payment of any contributions, penalties, or interest provided for in this division, the director may, not later than three years after the payment became delinquent or within 10 years after the last entry of a judgment under Article 5 (commencing with Section 1815) or within 10 years after the last recording or filing of a notice of state tax lien under Section 7171 of the Government Code, collect the delinquency or enforce any liens by levy served either personally or by first-class mail, to any person having in their possession or under their control any credits or personal property belonging to the delinquent person or employing unit, or owing any debts to the person or employing unit at the
 time of the receipt of the notice of levy.

(b) Any person other than a financial institution upon whom a notice of accounts receivable levy has been served having in their possession or under their control any credits or personal property belonging to the delinquent person or employing unit or owing any debts to the person or employing unit at the time of the receipt of the levy or coming into their possession or under their control for the period of one year from the time of receipt of the notice of accounts receivable levy, shall hold and remit the credits or personal property to the director or pay to the director the amount of any debt owing the delinquent employer after 10 but no later than 14 business days after service of the levy, and shall hold and remit the credits or personal property, or the amount of
 any debt owing to the delinquent employer coming into their possession or under their control within one year of receipt of the notice of accounts receivable levy after 10 but no later than 14 business days after the date of coming into possession or control of the credits or personal property, or the amount of any debt owing to the delinquent employer is incurred. Any person in possession of any credits or personal property or owing any debts to the delinquent person or employing unit who surrenders the credits or personal property or pays the debts owing the delinquent person or employing unit shall be discharged from any obligation or liability to the delinquent person or employing unit with respect to the credits or personal property surrendered or debts paid to the director.

(c) If the levy is made on a deposit or credits or
 personal property in the possession or under the control of a financial institution, the notice of levy shall be served on that financial institution at the same location as legal process is required to be served pursuant to Section 684.115 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and the levy will apply to all credits or personal property in the deposit account only at the time that notice of levy is received by the financial institution. The levy of a financial institution is treated as a single event and requires the financial institution to hold and remit funds after 10 but no later than 14 business days after receipt of the notice of levy.

(d) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Business day” means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday as recognized by the Internal Revenue Service, statewide legal holiday as recognized by the State of California pursuant to Section 6700 of the Government Code, or a day in which the department is closed pursuant to Section 12b of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(2) “Deposit account” has the same meaning as in paragraph (29) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code.

(3) “Financial institution” has the same meaning as in Section 481.113 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(4) “Legal process” has the same meaning as in Section 482.070 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 839, Sec. 1.   (AB 1389)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1755.1.

(a) In order to implement Section 1755, the department may serve notice to an address for any financial institution, as defined in Section 481.113 of the Code of Civil Procedure, by means of magnetic media, electronic transmission, or other electronic technology.

(b) For purposes of this section, the term “address” shall mean a telephone or modem number, facsimile machine, or any other reference number designated by the financial institution to receive data by electronic means.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 484, Sec. 16.   (AB 2364)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1756.

Notices of levy to the state, pursuant to Section 1755, shall be given to the state department, board, office or commission prior to the time it presents the claim of the person or employing unit to the State Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 873.)
-------------------------------------------

1757.

Any person notified pursuant to Section 1755 or 1755.1 who fails or refuses to surrender any credits or other personal property, or pay any debts owing to the delinquent employer, up to the amount specified in the levy, shall be liable in his or her own person and estate to the director in an amount equal to the value of the credits or other personal property in the amount of the debt, but not exceeding the amount specified in the notice of levy, if solely by reason of such failure or refusal, the department is unable to recover the contributions, penalties, or interest owing by the person with respect to which the notice was given.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 297.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.

As used in this article “person” includes this State and any county, city and county, municipality, district or other political subdivision thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Warrant for Collection [1785. - 1787.]

1785.

If any amount required to be paid under this division is not paid when due, the director or the director’s authorized representative may, not later than three years after the payment became delinquent, or within 10 years after the last entry of a judgment under Article 5 (commencing with Section 1815) or within 10 years after the last recording or filing of a notice of state tax lien under Section 7171 of the Government Code, issue a warrant for the enforcement of any liens and for the collection of any amount required to be paid to the state under this division. The warrant shall be directed to any sheriff, marshal, or peace officer of the Department of the California Highway Patrol and shall have the same effect as a writ of execution. The warrant shall be levied and sale made pursuant to it in the same manner and with the same effect as a levy of and a sale pursuant to a writ of execution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 451.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1786.

The department may pay or advance to the sheriff, marshal, or peace officer of the Department of the California Highway Patrol the same fees, commissions, and expenses for his or her services under this article as are provided by law for similar services pursuant to a writ of execution. The director, and not the court, shall approve the fees for publication in a newspaper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 452.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1787.

The fees, commissions, and expenses incurred in connection with the levying and execution of a warrant are the obligation of the person or employing unit required to pay any amount under this division and may be collected from him by virtue of the warrant or in any other manner provided in this chapter for the collection of the tax.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Summary Judgment [1815. - 1818.]

1815.

If any employing unit is delinquent in the payment of any contributions, penalties or interest provided for in this division, the director may, not later than 10 years after the payment became delinquent or within 10 years after the last entry of a judgment under this article or within 10 years after the last recording or filing of a notice of state tax lien under Section 7171 of the Government Code, file in the office of the Clerk of the Superior Court of Sacramento County, or with the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the employer has its principal place of business, a certificate specifying the amount of the contributions, interest and penalty due and the name and last known address of the employer liable therefor. The certificate shall also contain a statement that the director has complied with all the provisions of this division in relation to the computation and levy of the contributions, interest and penalty, and a request that judgment be entered against the employer in the amount set forth in the certificate. The clerk immediately upon the filing of the certificate shall enter a judgment for the State of California against the employer in the amount set forth in the certificate. Such judgment may be filed by the clerk in a looseleaf book entitled “Unemployment Contributions Judgments.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 592.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1816.

An abstract of a judgment secured pursuant to this article or a copy thereof may be recorded with the county recorder of any county and from the time of the recording, the amount of the judgment shall constitute a lien upon all the real property of the employer in that county, owned or acquired by him during the life of the lien. The lien shall have the force, effect and priority of a judgment lien and shall continue for 10 years after the last entry of a judgment under this article unless sooner released or otherwise discharged. The lien may, within 10 years after the last entry of a judgment under this article or within 10 years from the date of the last extension of the lien, be extended by recording a new abstract in the office of the county recorder of any county and from the time of such recording, the lien shall be extended to all the real property in such county for 10 years unless sooner released or otherwise discharged. Execution shall issue upon such a judgment upon request of the director in the same manner as execution may issue upon other judgments and sales shall be held under such execution as prescribed in the Code of Civil Procedure. In all proceedings under this section the director or his authorized agents may act on behalf of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 481.)
-------------------------------------------

1817.

(a) If the director determines that the amount of any contributions, interest, and penalties are sufficiently secured by a lien on other property or that the release or subordination of the lien imposed under Section 1816 will not jeopardize the collection of the amount of the contributions, interest, and penalties, the director may at any time release all or any portion of the property subject to the lien imposed by Section 1816 from the lien or may subordinate the lien imposed by Section 1816 to other liens and encumbrances.

(b) If the director finds that the liability represented by the lien imposed under Section 1816, including any interest accrued thereon, is legally unenforceable, the director may release the lien.

(c) A certificate by the director to the effect that any property has been released from a lien or that the lien has been subordinated to other liens and encumbrances is conclusive evidence that such property has been released or that the lien has been subordinated as provided in the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 600, Sec. 70.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1818.

The right of the director to use the summary judgment procedure contained in this article shall be in addition to any other collection procedure contained in this division. No action taken by the director shall be construed to be an election to pursue the summary judgment procedure to the exclusion of any other collection procedure in this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Civil Action [1851. - 1855.]

1851.

No injunction or writ of mandate or other legal or equitable process shall issue in any suit, action or proceeding, in any court against this State or against any officer thereof to prevent or enjoin the collection of any contribution sought to be collected under this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

1852.

In addition to any other tax administration and collection procedures authorized in this division, the director may bring an action in the courts of this or any other state or of the United States, in the name of the State of California, to administer the provisions of, and to collect the amount of any delinquent contributions or taxes, together with penalties and interest, due under this code. No such action shall be commenced later than:

(a) Three years after the date on which any amount due on a return or report filed by an employing unit or on an assessment made by the director becomes delinquent.

(b) Ten years after:

(1) The date on which a judgment is last entered under Article 5 of this chapter.

(2) The date on which a notice of state tax lien is last recorded or filed under Section 7171 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1049, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1853.

The courts of this State shall give preference on their calendar to any civil action brought by or against the director over all other civil litigation except equity cases, cases involving extraordinary writs, or summary proceedings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

1854.

In any civil action brought by or against the director a certificate under oath by the director or his authorized agent showing the delinquency shall be prima facie evidence of the levy of the contributions, of the delinquency of the amounts set forth, and of the compliance by the director with all the provisions of this division relating to the computation and levy of the amounts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 828.)
-------------------------------------------

1855.

(a) A civil action may be commenced at the request of the director in the name of the State of California to enjoin any individual or entity from conduct that, by solicitation, sale, or advertising, is inducing or otherwise attempting to persuade employers or employees, or potential employers or employees, to violate this code or to otherwise attempt to evade contributions or taxes provided for under this code by scheme, device, or similar activity. Any action under this section shall be brought in the Superior Court of the County of Sacramento or in the superior court of the county in which that individual or entity resides, has its principal place of business, or has engaged in conduct subject to penalty under this code.

(b) In any action under subdivision (a), the court may enjoin the person from engaging in the conduct or in any other activity specified in subdivision (a), if the court finds both of the following:

(1) That the person has engaged in any conduct specified in subdivision (a).

(2) That injunctive relief is appropriate to prevent recurrence of that conduct.

(c) For purposes of the civil action referred to in subdivisions (a) and (b), the court may issue without bond, a temporary restraining order upon the filing of a statement, certified by the director, which contains both of the following:

(1) That a determination has been made that the individual or entity is engaging in conduct described in subdivision (a), accompanied by a detailed description of the reasons for the determination.

(2) That the activity of the individual or entity will result in the nonpayment of contributions or taxes required under this code and that the contributions or taxes would be otherwise payable.

(d) The director shall provide the court clerk with an exact copy of the certified statement upon filing, which copy will be endorsed or certified by the court clerk and returned to the director, along with a certified copy of the court’s order. From the time of service of the endorsed or certified copy of the statement and order, that individual or entity shall be temporarily restrained from the activity set forth in the statement. That temporary restraining order will continue in effect unless dissolved after a hearing on a preliminary injunction in the Superior Court of Sacramento County or the county in which the individual or entity resides, has its place of business, or has engaged in the conduct specified in the statement. That hearing or preliminary injunction shall be held under the rules of the superior court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 646.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Additional Remedies [1860. - 1860.]

1860.

(a) For the purpose of collecting delinquent contributions, interest, and penalties, the director may enter into an agreement with one or more private persons, companies, associations, or corporations providing debt collection services outside this state with respect to the collection of delinquent contributions, interest, and penalties. That agreement may provide, at the discretion of the director, the rate of payment and the manner in which compensation for services shall be paid. The compensation, fees, and expenses may be added to the amount of the delinquent contributions, interest, and penalties and may be collected by the contractor from the debtor. The director shall provide the necessary information for the contractor to fulfill its obligation under the agreement.

(b) At the discretion of the director, the contractor may, as part of the collection process, refer the debt to legal representatives for litigation in the name of the director.

(c) No action taken by the director, pursuant to this section, shall be construed to be an election to forego other collection procedures in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1097, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Offers in Compromise [1870. - 1875.]

1870.

(a) When an employer or any individual assessed under Section 1735 owes delinquent contributions, withholdings, penalty, or interest to the department, the director may enter into an agreement to accept partial payment in satisfaction of the full liability under the following conditions when he or she believes that it will be in the best interest of the state.

(1) Offers in compromise shall be considered only for liabilities of inactive out-of-business accounts, and of individuals assessed under Section 1735 or partners only if the individual assessed or partner no longer has a controlling interest or association with the business that incurred the liability to which the offer in compromise applies.

(2) The employer, individual assessed under Section 1735, or partner does not have access to current income sufficient to pay more than the accumulating interest and 6.7 percent of the liability on an annual basis.

(3) The employer, individual assessed under Section 1735, or partner does not have reasonable prospects of acquiring increased income or assets that would enable him or her to liquidate the liability in a reasonable period.

(4) The employer, individual assessed under Section 1735, or partner does not have assets, whether or not subjected to lien by the department, that if sold, would satisfy the liability.

(5) The amount offered in compromise is more than the department could reasonably expect to collect through involuntary means during the four-year period beginning on the date on which a compromise agreement is tendered by the employer, individual assessed under Section 1735, or partner.

(6) The compromise offer is submitted by the taxpayer in writing and is accompanied by cash, a cashier’s check, or money order equal to the amount offered in compromise.

(7) Only nondisputed, final tax liabilities shall be considered for compromise.

(8) Liabilities that arose as a result of fraud or actions that resulted in a conviction for a violation of this code shall not be compromised.

(b) When in the director’s judgment it serves the best interest of the state, the director may permit the agreed upon amount to be paid in installments under a payment agreement not to exceed five years in length.

(c) The employer or individual submitting an offer shall be notified in writing when an offer in compromise is accepted or rejected.

(1) Moneys paid to the department along with an offer shall not be applied against the liability by the department until the offer has been accepted or rejected.

(2) In the event an offer is rejected, the amount will either be applied to the liability or refunded, at the discretion of the employer or individual submitting the offer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 356, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1871.

No agreement negotiated by the director under Section 1870 that reduces any liability by ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more shall be effective until it is reviewed and approved by the Unemployment Insurance Appeals Board. In reviewing any agreement, the Unemployment Insurance Appeals Board shall be restricted to determining, based on the case file submitted by the director, whether the director has exercised due diligence in determining whether the conditions set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 1870 have been satisfied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 356, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1872.

A determination by the director that it would not be in the best interest of the state to accept partial payment in satisfaction of a tax liability shall not be subject to administrative appeal or judicial review.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 356, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1873.

(a) Once the terms of the compromise agreement are fulfilled, including payment of the amount offered, the following shall occur:

(1) The liability shall be considered satisfied in full.

(2) All tax liens filed or recorded, or both, in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 1701) shall be released.

(3) A statement shall be placed on file with the department containing the following information:

(A) The taxpayer’s name and identification number.

(B) The year or years and quarter or quarters involved.

(C) The reason or reasons the liability was reduced by an offer in compromise.

(D) The total amount of unpaid tax, interest, additions to tax, and penalties at issue in the compromise.

(E) The terms of the offer in compromise.

(F) The total amount paid under the offer in compromise.

(b) All records of compromise required to be kept by the department may be reviewed as part of the annual single audit of the Employment Development Department.

(c) The department shall do all of the following:

(1) Notify the employer or individual submitting the offer in writing that the terms of the compromise agreement have been fulfilled, and that all liens filed or recorded, or both, in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 1701) against the taxpayer’s interests have been released.

(2) Furnish the employer or individual submitting the offer with a copy of the statement that is on file in accordance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(d) For a period of one year from the date that the statement is placed on file as required under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the statement shall be available for public inspection. However, no lists shall be distributed by the department in connection with these statements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 356, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1874.

In cases of joint and several liability, and where amounts are owed under Section 1735, an agreement under Section 1870 to accept partial payment in satisfaction of the liability of one or more debtors shall neither relieve any other debtors of the obligation to liquidate the entire balance of the debt remaining unpaid, nor grant to the debtor or debtors any right to appeal or seek judicial review of the director’s determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 356, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1875.

(a) If an offer under Section 1870 to accept partial payment in satisfaction of the liability has been accepted, and it is subsequently determined that any person willfully did any of the following, the acceptance shall be rescinded and all compromised liabilities shall be reestablished without regard to any statute of limitations that is applicable to this division:

(1) Concealed from any officer or employee of the state any property belonging to the estate of the employer or other person liable with respect to the tax.

(2) Received, withheld, destroyed, mutilated, or falsified any book, document, or record.

(3) Made any false statement relating to the estate or financial conditions of the employer or other person liable with respect to the tax.

(4) Failed to pay any tax liability owed the department for any subsequent, active business in which the employer or individual who previously submitted the offer in compromise has a controlling interest or association.

(b) Upon any rescission pursuant to subdivision (a), the department, at its discretion, may file a Notice of State Tax Lien against the individuals or entity responsible for the previously compromised liability.

(c) For all rescissions under subdivision (a), the department shall notify the employer or individual who previously submitted the offer in compromise in writing of both of the following:

(1) The rescission of any offer and reasons therefor.

(2) The amount of reestablished liability that is due and payable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 217.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Penalty Assessments [1900. - 1900.]

1900.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Industrial Relations may enter into an agreement with the department that provides for the transfer of all or part of the responsibility from the Department of Industrial Relations, or any office or division within that department, to the department for the collection of penalty assessments including, but not limited to, delinquent fees, wages, penalties, judgments, assessments, costs, citations, debts, and any interest thereon, arising out of the enforcement of any law within the jurisdiction of the Department of Industrial Relations or any office or division within. The agreement shall specify the terms under which those items and interest shall become subject to collection by the
 department.

(2) The agreement shall also prescribe a procedure for the Department of Industrial Relations to reimburse the department for the costs of collection, and provide that the amount of any reimbursement shall not exceed the actual costs of collection, including court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees. Wherever possible the collection costs shall be borne by the debtor.

(b) For amounts referred for collection under subdivision (a), interest shall accrue at the adjusted annual rate and by the method established pursuant to Section 685.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure from and after the date of notice until paid.

(c) Amounts referred for collection under subdivision (a) shall be treated as final liabilities and due and payable to the State of California and may be collected from the debtor by the
 department in any manner authorized under the law for collection of any amount imposed under this division. Any information, information sources, enforcement remedies, and capabilities available to the Department of Industrial Relations shall be available to the department to be used in conjunction with, or independent of, the information, information sources, remedies, and capabilities available to the department for purposes of administering this code.

(d) The provisions of Article 8 (commencing with Section 1870) and Section 1110.1 shall not apply to amounts referred for collection under subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 719, Sec. 61.   (SB 856)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Hearing Procedure [1951. - 1960.]

1951.
